Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.80, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Expiration. The authority to impose the tax under this section expires January 1, deleted text begin 2028deleted text end new text begin 2036new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for all deeds and mortgages acknowledged on or after July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383B.80, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Expiration. The authority to impose the tax under this section expires January 1, deleted text begin 2028deleted text end new text begin 2036new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for all deeds and mortgages acknowledged on or after July 1, 2026. new text end